Colorado, session 2026A, SB071.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Short title. The short title of this act is the
"Surveillance Accountability and Freedom Ensured (SAFE) Act".
SECTION 2. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds and declares that:
(a) The use of surveillance technologies by law enforcement
agencies, including the use of speed cameras, automated license plate
-2- SB26-071

readers, red-light cameras, pole-mounted cameras, drones, and facial
recognition systems, can enhance public safety by aiding in the
prevention, detection, and investigation of crimes;
(b) However, the unchecked deployment and use of surveillance
technologies pose significant risks to the privacy, civil liberties, and
constitutional rights of Coloradans, including the potential for
surveillance without a warrant, misuse of data, and disproportionate
impacts on marginalized communities;
(c) It is necessary to establish clear guardrails on the use,
collection, storage, access, sharing, and destruction of data obtained
through surveillance technologies in order to strike a proper balance
between protecting privacy and promoting public safety; and
(d) These guardrails must include mechanisms for public
transparency and accountability with minimal bureaucratic hurdles to
ensure compliance and build public trust.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add part 15 to article
31 of title 24 as follows:
PART 15
SURVEILLANCE ACCOUNTABILITY FOR LAW
ENFORCEMENT AGENCIES
24-31-1501. Definitions.
AS USED IN THIS PART 15, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(1) "AUTHORIZED PERSONNEL" MEANS AN EMPLOYEE OF A LAW
ENFORCEMENT AGENCY WHO HAS BEEN TRAINED AND CERTIFIED IN THE
PROPER USE AND HANDLING OF SURVEILLANCE DATA, AS DETERMINED BY
THE LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY'S POLICY DEVELOPED IN COMPLIANCE
-3- SB26-071

WITH THIS PART 15.
(2) "INVESTIGATION" MEANS AN ACTIVE INQUIRY INTO A SPECIFIC
ALLEGED VIOLATION OF LAW BASED ON REASONABLE SUSPICION OR
PROBABLE CAUSE.
(3) "LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY" HAS THE SAME MEANING AS
"STATE OR LOCAL LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY" AS DEFINED IN SECTION
24-33.5-115 (4)(b).
(4) "SURVEILLANCE DATA" MEANS INFORMATION COLLECTED,
RECORDED, OR GENERATED BY SURVEILLANCE TECHNOLOGY, INCLUDING
IMAGES, VIDEOS, METADATA, LICENSE PLATE NUMBERS, FACIAL SCANS,
LOCATION DATA, OR DERIVED ANALYTICS.
(5) (a) "SURVEILLANCE TECHNOLOGY" MEANS AN ELECTRONIC
DEVICE OR SYSTEM USED BY A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY FOR THE
PURPOSE OF MONITORING, RECORDING, OR ANALYZING INDIVIDUALS,
VEHICLES, OR PUBLIC SPACES.
(b) "SURVEILLANCE TECHNOLOGY" INCLUDES:
(I) SPEED CAMERAS;
(II) AUTOMATED LICENSE PLATE READERS;
(III) RED-LIGHT CAMERAS;
(IV) POLE-MOUNTED CAMERAS;
(V) DRONES OR OTHER UNMANNED AERIAL VEHICLE
SURVEILLANCE SYSTEMS;
(VI) FACIAL RECOGNITION SOFTWARE OR SYSTEMS; AND
(VII) OTHER TECHNOLOGY USED BY A LAW ENFORCEMENT
AGENCY TO CAPTURE VISUAL, AUDIO, OR LOCATION INFORMATION.
24-31-1502. Restrictions on surveillance data collection by law
enforcement agencies - public impact assessment.
-4- SB26-071

(1) A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY MAY USE SURVEILLANCE
TECHNOLOGY ONLY FOR LAWFUL PURPOSES DIRECTLY RELATED TO PUBLIC
SAFETY, INCLUDING TRAFFIC ENFORCEMENT, CRIME PREVENTION, OR AN
ACTIVE INVESTIGATION.
(2) A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY THAT USES SURVEILLANCE
TECHNOLOGY TO COLLECT SURVEILLANCE DATA SHALL:
(a) USE THE SURVEILLANCE TECHNOLOGY ONLY IN A MANNER
THAT IS TARGETED AND MINIMIZES INCIDENTAL CAPTURE OF
NONRELEVANT INDIVIDUALS OR ACTIVITIES;
(b) USE FACIAL RECOGNITION SYSTEMS ONLY AFTER OBTAINING A
WARRANT OR IN EXIGENT CIRCUMSTANCES WHEN THERE IS AN IMMINENT
THREAT TO PUBLIC SAFETY;
(c) CONFIGURE AUTOMATED LICENSE PLATE READERS, SPEED
CAMERAS, RED-LIGHT CAMERAS, TRAFFIC CAMERAS, AND OTHER
SURVEILLANCE TECHNOLOGY USED IN TRAFFIC ENFORCEMENT TO CAPTURE
SURVEILLANCE DATA ONLY FROM PUBLIC SPACES AND FOR SPECIFIC LAW
ENFORCEMENT PURPOSES, SUCH AS IDENTIFYING STOLEN VEHICLES OR
ENFORCING TRAFFIC LAWS; AND
(d) OPERATE DRONES OR OTHER UNMANNED AERIAL VEHICLE
SURVEILLANCE SYSTEMS ONLY IN COMPLIANCE WITH FEDERAL AVIATION
ADMINISTRATION REGULATIONS AND SHALL INCLUDE REAL-TIME LOGGING
OF FLIGHT PATHS AND SURVEILLANCE DATA COLLECTION SCOPES.
(3) (a) BEFORE A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY PURCHASES,
CONTRACTS FOR OR RENEWS A CONTRACT FOR, DEPLOYS IN A NEW WAY OR
LOCATION, OR UPGRADES A SURVEILLANCE TECHNOLOGY, THE LAW
ENFORCEMENT AGENCY SHALL:
(I) CONDUCT A PUBLIC PRIVACY IMPACT ASSESSMENT THAT
-5- SB26-071

INCLUDES COMMUNITY INPUT AND AN OPPORTUNITY FOR PUBLIC
TESTIMONY; AND
(II) OBTAIN APPROVAL FROM THE GOVERNING BODY OF THE STATE
OR LOCAL GOVERNMENT ENTITY THAT OVERSEES THE LAW ENFORCEMENT
AGENCY.
(b) THE REQUIREMENTS OF SUBSECTION (3)(a) OF THIS SECTION
APPLY TO A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY THAT CURRENTLY USES
SURVEILLANCE TECHNOLOGY WHENEVER THE LAW ENFORCEMENT
AGENCY:
(I) RENEWS A CONTRACT FOR THE USE OF SURVEILLANCE
TECHNOLOGY;
(II) PURCHASES OR DEPLOYS A NEW TYPE OF SURVEILLANCE
TECHNOLOGY;
(III) DEPLOYS AN EXISTING SURVEILLANCE TECHNOLOGY IN A NEW
MANNER OR IN A NEW LOCATION; OR
(IV) UPGRADES THE LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY'S EXISTING
SURVEILLANCE TECHNOLOGY SYSTEMS.
24-31-1503. Surveillance data - storage and retention of data
- destruction of data - access and sharing of data - prohibition on sale
of data.
(1) A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY THAT COLLECTS SURVEILLANCE
DATA SHALL ENSURE THAT THE SURVEILLANCE DATA IS STORED SECURELY,
INCLUDING ENSURING THAT THE SURVEILLANCE DATA IS ENCRYPTED OR
OTHERWISE RENDERED UNREADABLE TO AN UNAUTHORIZED USER BY
USING A METHOD OR TECHNOLOGY GENERALLY ACCEPTED IN THE FIELD OF
INFORMATION SECURITY.
(2) UNLESS THE SURVEILLANCE DATA IS PART OF AN ACTIVE
-6- SB26-071

INVESTIGATION:
(a) SURVEILLANCE DATA COLLECTED FROM TRAFFIC CAMERAS,
SPEED CAMERAS, RED-LIGHT CAMERAS, AND AUTOMATED LICENSE PLATE
READERS MUST NOT BE STORED FOR LONGER THAN THIRTY DAYS;
(b) SURVEILLANCE DATA COLLECTED FROM POLE-MOUNTED
CAMERAS, DRONES, OR OTHER UNMANNED AERIAL VEHICLE SURVEILLANCE
SYSTEMS MUST NOT BE STORED FOR LONGER THAN NINETY DAYS; AND
(c) SURVEILLANCE DATA COLLECTED FROM FACIAL RECOGNITION
SOFTWARE OR SYSTEMS MUST NOT BE STORED FOR LONGER THAN SEVEN
DAYS.
(3) IF SURVEILLANCE DATA IS PART OF AN ACTIVE INVESTIGATION,
THE SURVEILLANCE DATA MAY BE RETAINED UNTIL THE MATTER IS
RESOLVED, INCLUDING THE CONCLUSION OF ANY APPEALS, BUT MUST BE
REVIEWED ANNUALLY FOR NECESSITY AND DESTROYED IF THE DATA IS NO
LONGER RELEVANT TO THE MATTER.
(4) (a) A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY SHALL ENSURE THAT ACCESS
TO SURVEILLANCE DATA IS LIMITED TO AUTHORIZED PERSONNEL AND THAT
SURVEILLANCE DATA IS ACCESSED ONLY FOR LEGITIMATE LAW
ENFORCEMENT PURPOSES.
(b) WHEN AUTHORIZED PERSONNEL ACCESSES SURVEILLANCE
DATA, THE AGENCY SHALL ENSURE THAT INFORMATION RELATED TO THAT
ACCESS IS COLLECTED, INCLUDING:
(I) THE NAME OF THE PERSON THAT ACCESSED THE SURVEILLANCE
DATA;
(II) THE DATE AND TIME THE PERSON ACCESSED THE
SURVEILLANCE DATA; AND
(III) THE PURPOSE FOR WHICH THE SURVEILLANCE DATA WAS
-7- SB26-071

ACCESSED.
(c) THE LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY SHALL RETAIN THE
INFORMATION COLLECTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (4)(b) OF
THIS SECTION FOR AT LEAST FIVE YEARS AFTER THE DATE THE
SURVEILLANCE DATA WAS ACCESSED.
(5) A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY MAY SHARE SURVEILLANCE
DATA WITH ANOTHER LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY IF:
(a) THERE IS A SPECIFIC, DOCUMENTED NEED FOR THE OTHER LAW
ENFORCEMENT AGENCY TO ACCESS THE SURVEILLANCE DATA AND THE
NEED IS RELATED TO AN ACTIVE INVESTIGATION; AND
(b) THE LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY THAT RECEIVES THE
SURVEILLANCE DATA AGREES, IN WRITING, TO COMPLY WITH THE
REQUIREMENTS OF THIS PART 15.
(6) (a) A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY OR AN EMPLOYEE OR
CONTRACTOR OF A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY SHALL NOT SELL, LICENSE,
OR OTHERWISE MONETIZE SURVEILLANCE DATA COLLECTED BY THE LAW
ENFORCEMENT AGENCY.
(b) A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY OR AN EMPLOYEE OR
CONTRACTOR OF A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY THAT VIOLATES
SUBSECTION (6)(a) OF THIS SECTION MAY BE SUBJECT TO CIVIL PENALTIES
IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 24-31-1505.
(7) (a) A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY SHALL PERMANENTLY AND
SECURELY DESTROY SURVEILLANCE DATA AT THE END OF THE RETENTION
PERIOD DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS SECTION OR WHEN THE
SURVEILLANCE DATA IS NO LONGER NEEDED FOR AN ACTIVE MATTER.
(b) A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY SHALL ENSURE THAT
SURVEILLANCE DATA IS DESTROYED IN A MANNER IN WHICH THE
-8- SB26-071

SURVEILLANCE DATA CANNOT BE RECOVERED.
(c) A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY SHALL COLLECT INFORMATION
RELATED TO THE DESTRUCTION OF SURVEILLANCE DATA, INCLUDING THE
DATE AND METHOD OF DESTRUCTION, AND SHALL MAINTAIN A RECORD OF
THAT INFORMATION FOR AT LEAST FIVE YEARS AFTER THE DATE THE
SURVEILLANCE DATA WAS DESTROYED.
24-31-1504. Verification of compliance and transparency.
(1) A RESIDENT OF THE JURISDICTION SERVED BY A LOCAL LAW
ENFORCEMENT AGENCY, OR A RESIDENT OF THE STATE FOR THE COLORADO
STATE PATROL OR COLORADO BUREAU OF INVESTIGATION, MAY REQUEST
INFORMATION FROM THE LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY REGARDING THE
AGENCY'S USE OF SURVEILLANCE TECHNOLOGY AND THE AGENCY'S
COLLECTION, STORAGE, AND DESTRUCTION OF SURVEILLANCE DATA THAT
DEMONSTRATES THE LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY'S COMPLIANCE WITH
THIS PART 15. THE LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY SHALL PROVIDE THE
INFORMATION REQUESTED FREE OF CHARGE TO THE RESIDENT.
(2) A REQUEST SUBMITTED BY A RESIDENT IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION MAY BE SUBMITTED TO THE LAW
ENFORCEMENT AGENCY THROUGH EMAIL, THROUGH AN ONLINE PORTAL,
OR BY MAIL. A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY THAT RECEIVES A REQUEST
SHALL SEND A RESPONSE TO THE RESIDENT WITHIN TEN BUSINESS DAYS
AFTER RECEIVING THE REQUEST.
(3) A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY MAY DEMONSTRATE
COMPLIANCE WITH THIS PART 15 IN RESPONSE TO A REQUEST SUBMITTED
PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION BY PROVIDING THE REQUESTING RESIDENT THE
FOLLOWING INFORMATION:
(a) CONFIRMATION THAT SPECIFIC SURVEILLANCE DATA RELATED
-9- SB26-071

TO THE REQUESTOR'S PERSONAL IDENTIFYING INFORMATION HAS BEEN
DESTROYED;
(b) ACCESS TO ANONYMIZED LOGS THAT DEMONSTRATE WHETHER
SURVEILLANCE DATA RELATED TO THE REQUESTOR WAS ACCESSED,
SHARED, OR DESTROYED; AND
(c) REPORTS ON THE LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY'S OVERALL
COMPLIANCE WITH THIS PART 15, INCLUDING ANY ANNUAL REPORTS OR
AUDITS CONDUCTED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (4) OR (5) OF THIS
SECTION. THE LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY SHALL ENSURE THAT ALL
PERSONAL IDENTIFYING INFORMATION HAS BEEN REDACTED FROM A
REPORT BEFORE SENDING THE REPORT TO THE REQUESTING RESIDENT.
(4) A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY THAT USES SURVEILLANCE
TECHNOLOGY SHALL PUBLISH AN ANNUAL REPORT ON ITS PUBLICLY
ACCESSIBLE WEBSITE THAT INCLUDES THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION:
(a) THE TYPES OF SURVEILLANCE TECHNOLOGIES USED BY THE LAW
ENFORCEMENT AGENCY;
(b) AGGREGATE AND ANONYMIZED INFORMATION RELATED TO THE
COLLECTION, RETENTION, ACCESS, SHARING, AND DESTRUCTION OF
SURVEILLANCE DATA; AND
(c) ANY COMPLAINTS RECEIVED BY THE LAW ENFORCEMENT
AGENCY OR VIOLATIONS COMMITTED BY THE LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY
IN RELATION TO THE USE OF SURVEILLANCE TECHNOLOGY OR THE
COLLECTION, STORAGE, AND DESTRUCTION OF SURVEILLANCE DATA AND
HOW THE COMPLAINTS OR VIOLATIONS WERE RESOLVED.
(5) (a) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL CONDUCT AN
INDEPENDENT AUDIT OF A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY THAT USES
SURVEILLANCE TECHNOLOGY AT LEAST EVERY TWO YEARS AND PUBLISH
-10- SB26-071

THE RESULTS OF THE AUDIT ON THE ATTORNEY GENERAL'S PUBLICLY
ACCESSIBLE WEBSITE.
(b) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL'S AUDIT OF A LAW ENFORCEMENT
AGENCY CONDUCTED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (5)(a) OF THIS SECTION
MUST INCLUDE:
(I) VERIFICATION THAT THE LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY IS USING
SURVEILLANCE TECHNOLOGY IN A MANNER THAT COMPLIES WITH THIS
PART 15;
(II) VERIFICATION THAT THE LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY IS
STORING, RETAINING, SHARING, AND DESTROYING SURVEILLANCE DATA IN
COMPLIANCE WITH THIS PART 15; AND
(III) A REVIEW OF OTHER RELEVANT INFORMATION OR
DOCUMENTATION THAT THE ATTORNEY GENERAL DETERMINES IS
NECESSARY TO VERIFY THE LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY'S COMPLIANCE
WITH THIS PART 15.
24-31-1505. Enforcement and penalties - admissibility.
(1) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL OR AN INDIVIDUAL AFFECTED BY A
VIOLATION OF THIS PART 15 MAY BRING A CIVIL ACTION AGAINST A LAW
ENFORCEMENT AGENCY.
(2) IF A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY IS FOUND TO HAVE VIOLATED
THIS PART 15, THE COURT MAY ORDER:
(a) INJUNCTIVE RELIEF;
(b) CIVIL PENALTIES OF UP TO FIVE THOUSAND DOLLARS PER
VIOLATION;
(c) REASONABLE ATTORNEY FEES AND COSTS; AND
(d) DISCIPLINARY ACTION AGAINST LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY
PERSONNEL, INCLUDING TERMINATION.
-11- SB26-071

(3) IF THE COURT ORDERS CIVIL PENALTIES TO BE PAID BY A LAW
ENFORCEMENT AGENCY IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (2)(b) OF THIS
SECTION IN AN ACTION BROUGHT BY THE ATTORNEY GENERAL, THE CIVIL
PENALTIES SHALL BE CREDITED TO THE GENERAL FUND.
(4) SURVEILLANCE DATA ACCESSED IN VIOLATION OF THIS PART 15
IS NOT ADMISSIBLE AS EVIDENCE IN ANY CRIMINAL OR CIVIL PROCEEDING
OR ANY OTHER JUDICIAL, QUASI-JUDICIAL, OR ADMINISTRATIVE HEARING
OR PROCEEDING; EXCEPT THAT THE SURVEILLANCE DATA IS ADMISSIBLE
AGAINST A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY IN A CIVIL ACTION BROUGHT
AGAINST THE LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (1)
OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 4. Act subject to petition - effective date -
applicability. (1) This act takes effect July 1, 2027; except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within the ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general
assembly, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
approved by the people at the general election to be held in November
2026 and, in such case, will take effect July 1, 2027.
(2) This act applies to conduct occurring on or after the applicable
effective date of this act.
-12- SB26-071